src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-n_22oi_kurkkio-dial_Var.gen_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: linn../bin/olo-gen.hfstol
    Morph: linn../bin/olo.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: linn../bin/iolo.fst
    Morph: linn../bin/olo.fst
    App: linnlookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: linnrun analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kurkkio: # Noun 'borg' - ei tsekattu
     kurkkio+N+Sg+Nom: kurkkio
     kurkkio+N+Sg+Gen: kurkkion
     kurkkio+N+Sg+Par: kurkkioa # kurkkiota myös? 
     kurkkio+N+Sg+Tra: kurkkioksi
     kurkkio+N+Sg+Abe: kurkkiotta
     kurkkio+N+Sg+Ine: kurkkiossa
     kurkkio+N+Sg+Ela: kurkkiosta
     kurkkio+N+Sg+Ill: kurkkihoon
     kurkkio+N+Sg+Ade: kurkkiolla
     kurkkio+N+Sg+Abl: kurkkiolta
     kurkkio+N+Sg+All: kurkkiolle
     kurkkio+N+Sg+Ess: kurkkionna
     kurkkio+N+Pl+Nom: kurkkiot
     kurkkio+N+Pl+Gen: kurkkioitten
     kurkkio+N+Pl+Par: kurkkioita
     kurkkio+N+Pl+Tra: kurkkioiksi
     kurkkio+N+Pl+Abe: kurkkioitta
     kurkkio+N+Pl+Ine: kurkkioissa
     kurkkio+N+Pl+Ela: kurkkioista
     kurkkio+N+Pl+Ill: kurkkihoin
     kurkkio+N+Pl+Ade: kurkkioila
     kurkkio+N+Pl+Abl: kurkkioilta
     kurkkio+N+Pl+All: kurkkioile
     kurkkio+N+Pl+Ess: kurkkioina
     kurkkio+N+Pl+Com: kurkkioine
